Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1646
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Jury Selection Act:

(1) Combined list means the list created pursuant to section 25-1654 by merging the lists of names from the Department of Motor Vehicles and from election records into one list;

(2) Grand jury means a body of people who are chosen to sit permanently for at least a month and up to a year and who, in ex parte proceedings, decide whether to issue indictments in criminal cases;

(3) Jury commissioner means the person designated in section 25-1647;

(4) Jury list means a list or lists of names of potential jurors drawn from the master key list for possible service on grand and petit juries;

(5) Jury management system means an electronic process in which individuals are randomly selected to serve as grand or petit jurors and for which the presence of a district court judge or other designated official is not required. A jury management system may also provide an electronic process for a potential juror to complete and submit a juror qualification form and to receive summonses and notifications regarding jury service;

(6) Jury panel means the persons summoned to serve as grand or petit jurors for such period of a jury term as determined by the judge or judges;

(7) Jury term means a month, calendar quarter, year, or other period of time as determined by the judge or judges during which grand or petit jurors are selected for service from a master key list. A jury term shall not extend beyond the time by which a new combined list is required to be prepared pursuant to section 25-1654, except by order of the court;

(8) Manual jury selection process means a process in which individuals are randomly selected to serve on a grand or petit jury by drawing names from a wheel or box while in the presence of a district court judge or other official designated by the judge;

(9) Master key list means the list of names selected using the key number pursuant to section 25-1654;

(10) One-step qualifying and summoning system means a process for selecting and summoning grand or petit jurors in which a juror qualification form and summons, or instructions to complete a jury qualification form through a jury management system and a summons, are sent to a potential juror at the same time;

(11) Petit jury means a group of jurors who may be summoned and empaneled in the trial of a specific case;

(12) Tales juror means a person selected from among the bystanders in court or the people of the county to serve as a juror when the original jury panel has become deficient in number; and

(13) Two-step qualifying and summoning system means a process for selecting and summoning grand or petit jurors in which a juror qualification form, or instructions to complete a jury qualification form through a jury management system, is sent to a potential juror and, if the juror is qualified and drawn for jury service, a summons is sent.

Laws 2020, LB387, § 3.